Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 4, makes the article effective July 1, 2005.

§ 20-5-501.
Application and construction.

In applying and construing this act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Applicability. —

Father's failure to include a child's residences in a petition to modify a custody order did not amount to an error because the provisions of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act did not apply to intrastate matters. MBB v. ERW, 2004 WY 134, 100 P.3d 415,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 175

(Wyo. 2004).

§ 20-5-502.
Transitional provision.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination which was commenced before the effective date of this act is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The effective date of this act is the effective date of Laws 2005, ch. 11, which is July 1, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).